Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4815
Farm mediation service; maintain statistical records.

The farm mediation service shall maintain complete statistical records of program participation and costs and make them available upon request.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 15.